New York, session 2025-2026, S8433.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (bb) and (cc) of subdivision 1 of section 1367 2 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, as amended by 3 section 3 of part Y of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, are amended and 4 two new paragraphs (dd) and (ee) are added to read as follows: 5 (bb) "Suspicious wagering activity" means unusual wagering activity 6 that cannot be explained and is indicative of match fixing, the manipu- 7 lation of an event, misuse of inside information, or other prohibited 8 activity; [and] 9 (cc) "Independent integrity monitor" means an independent individual 10 or entity approved by the commission to receive reports of unusual 11 wagering activity from a casino, mobile sports wagering licensee, or 12 commission for the purpose of assisting in identifying suspicious wager- 13 ing activity[.]; 14 (dd) "Horse racing event" means any sport or athletic event conducted 15 in New York state subject to the provisions of article two, three, five, 16 nine, or ten of this chapter, as well as any sport or athletic event 17 conducted outside of New York state which would otherwise be subject to 18 the provisions of articles two, five, nine, or ten of this chapter. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13379-02-6 S. 8433--A 2 1 "Horse racing event" shall not include harness races conducted outside 2 of New York state; and 3 (ee) "Fixed odds sports wagering agreement" means an agreement between 4 a mobile sports wagering operator, mobile sports wagering licensee, or 5 operator and an entity that possesses a license awarded pursuant to 6 article two or three of this chapter that has the authority to conduct 7 pari-mutuel wagering on the form of racing involved in the relevant 8 horse racing event, involving wagers to be made solely by residents of 9 the state of New York while located within New York, and subject to the 10 approval of the commission. 11 § 2. Paragraph (s) of subdivision 1 of section 1367 of the racing, 12 pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, as amended by section 3 of part Y 13 of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 14 (s) "Prohibited sports event" means a sport or athletic event in which 15 any New York college team participates regardless of where the event 16 takes place, [or] a high school sport or athletic event, or a horse 17 racing event, unless such horse racing event is being offered pursuant 18 to a fixed odds sports wagering agreement, as defined in paragraph (ee) 19 of this subdivision. The following shall not be considered prohibited 20 sports events: (i) a collegiate tournament, and (ii) a sports event 21 within such tournament so long as no New York college team is partic- 22 ipating in that particular sports event; 23 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 1367 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering 24 and breeding law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-1) to read as 25 follows: 26 (e-1)(i)(1) A mobile sports wagering operator, mobile sports wagering 27 licensee, or operator may accept a fixed odds wager on a horse racing 28 event if such mobile sports wagering operator, mobile sports wagering 29 licensee, or operator has entered into a fixed odds sports wagering 30 agreement with an entity that has the authority to provide the content 31 of such horse racing event pursuant to article two or three of this 32 chapter. In furtherance of any fixed odds sports wagering agreement, an 33 entity that holds a franchise or license pursuant to article two of this 34 chapter may only offer content involving thoroughbred races and an enti- 35 ty that holds a license pursuant to article three of this chapter may 36 only offer content involving standardbred races, except that an entity 37 that holds a license pursuant to article three of this chapter may 38 authorize an entity that holds a franchise or license pursuant to arti- 39 cle two of this chapter to negotiate on its behalf, subject to final 40 approval of the entity that holds a license pursuant to article three of 41 this chapter. Any fixed odds sports wagering agreement with an entity 42 that has the authority to provide the content of a horse racing event 43 shall require the approval of the applicable horsemen's association. 44 (2) All fixed odds sports wagering agreements must be approved by the 45 commission prior to taking effect. Any content offered pursuant to an 46 approved fixed odds sports wagering agreement shall subsequently be made 47 available to any interested mobile sports wagering operator, mobile 48 sports wagering licensee, or operator on commercially reasonable terms, 49 as determined by the commission. 50 (ii) Any holder of a pari-mutuel wagering franchise or license pursu- 51 ant to article two or three of this chapter that enters into a fixed 52 odds sports wagering agreement shall: (1) make a copy of such sports 53 wagering agreement available to the applicable horsemen's association; 54 and (2) separately maintain an agreement with the applicable horsemen's 55 association, setting forth the type of wagers that may be placed on a S. 8433--A 3 1 horse racing event and on which horse racing events wagers may be 2 placed. 3 (iii)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to 4 the contrary, any and all gross payments made by a mobile sports wager- 5 ing operator, mobile sports wagering licensee, or operator pursuant to 6 any fixed odds sports wagering agreement as defined in paragraph (ee) of 7 subdivision one of this section, shall be allocated in the following 8 amounts for any amount generated during a calendar year: two-thirds to 9 the thoroughbred industry and the remaining one-third to harness racing 10 associations and corporations. For purposes of this paragraph, all gross 11 payments pursuant to a fixed odds sports wagering agreement shall 12 include, without limitation, wagering revenue, signing or other start-up 13 fees, exclusivity fees, market go live fees, horse racing content fees 14 and any other amounts paid in consideration of the fixed odds sports 15 wagering agreement, in each case without any deduction or offset, but 16 shall not include any revenue generated for sponsorships. 17 (2) a. Of the payments allocated to the thoroughbred industry, five- 18 sixths shall be allocated to the franchised corporation and one-sixth 19 shall be allocated to a thoroughbred racing association. Of those funds, 20 payment of an amount equal to forty-three percent of the allocated 21 payment shall be paid into an account for enhancing purses at such 22 racing association or corporation or franchised corporation, and seven 23 percent shall be contributed to the New York state thoroughbred breeding 24 and development fund corporation established pursuant to section two 25 hundred fifty-two of this chapter. 26 b. Of the payments allocated to the harness racing associations and 27 corporations, payment of an amount equal to forty-three percent of the 28 allocated payment shall be paid into an account for enhancing purses at 29 such racing associations or corporations, and seven percent shall be 30 contributed to the agriculture and New York state horse breeding devel- 31 opment fund established pursuant to section three hundred thirty of this 32 chapter. The remaining forty-three percent to be allocated for enhancing 33 purses and the remaining fifty percent of the funds allocated for 34 harness racing associations and corporations, shall be allocated to 35 individual harness racing associations and corporations based on a ratio 36 where the numerator is the association's or corporation's total in-state 37 handle on live racing for the previous calendar year as calculated by 38 the commission and the denominator is the total in-state on live handle 39 for all harness racing associations and corporations for the previous 40 calendar year as calculated by the commission. 41 (3) In order to ensure appropriate distribution by and among the 42 tracks, each holder of a pari-mutuel wagering franchise or license 43 pursuant to article two or three of this chapter that enters into a 44 fixed odds sports wagering agreement shall notify each other thorough- 45 bred and harness track on or prior to the twentieth day of each month, 46 of any and all payments made by a mobile sports wagering operator, 47 mobile sports wagering licensee, or operator pursuant to any fixed odds 48 sports wagering agreement, including but not limited to horse racing 49 content fees, generated during the prior month. 50 § 4. This act shall take effect April 1, 2027 and shall expire March 51 31, 2030 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed 52 repealed.